Tennessee statutes. Title 10 Public Libraries, Archives and Records
Chapter 8

Confidentiality of Library Records

10-8-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Library” means:

A library that is open to the public and established or operated by:

The state, a county, city, town, school district or any other political subdivision of the state;

A combination of governmental units or authorities;

A university or community college; or

Any private library that is open to the public; and

“Library record” means a document, record, or other method of storing information retained by a library that identifies a person as having requested or obtained specific information or materials from such library. “Library record” does not include nonidentifying material that may be retained for the purpose of studying or evaluating the circulation of library materials in general.

Acts 1988, ch. 889, § 1.

10-8-102. Disclosure prohibited — Exceptions.

Except as provided in subsection (b), no employee of a library shall disclose any library record that identifies a person as having requested or obtained specific materials, information, or services or as having otherwise used such library. Such library records shall be considered an exception to § 10-7-503.

Library records may be disclosed under the following circumstances:

Upon the written consent of the library user;

Pursuant to the order of a court of competent jurisdiction; or

When used to seek reimbursement for or the return of lost, stolen, misplaced or otherwise overdue library materials.

Acts 1988, ch. 889, § 1.

10-8-103. Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to libraries included within chapters 1 and 3-5 of this title.

Acts 1988, ch. 889, § 1.